Maine, session 132, LD148.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §241, as amended by PL 2015, c. 44, §3, is further amended to read:
§241. State Auditor; salary
The State Auditor is the head of the Office of the State Auditor. The State Auditor must
be a certified public accountant or a college graduate with not less than 6 years of
experience as a professional accountant or auditor, including not less than 5 years of
auditing experience, of which not less than 4 years must have been in a supervisory
capacity. The Until 2028, the State Auditor must be elected by the Legislature by a joint
ballot of the Senators and Representatives in convention and holds office for a term of 4
years or until a successor is elected and qualified. Beginning in 2028, the State Auditor is
elected every 4 years in the same manner as is the Governor. If a vacancy occurs, the
Governor shall appoint a successor who is subject to confirmation in the same manner as
Justices of the Supreme Judicial Court. The State Auditor shall exercise such the powers
and perform such the duties as are set forth in this chapter. In Until 2028, in case the office
of State Auditor becomes vacant during a period when the Legislature is not in session, the
appointment of a person to fill such vacancy must be made immediately by the President
of the Senate or if that office is vacant, by the Speaker of the House, and the person
appointed holds that office until such time as the Legislature meets in regular or special
session, and either confirm the appointment of the person or chooses another person to fill
the office during the unexpired term.
If a person elected to the office of State Auditor is not qualified as, or has not
successfully completed or passed the examination for, a certified public accountant,
certified information systems auditor or certified internal auditor at the time of election and
fails to become so qualified within 9 months of being sworn into office, as required by
section 242, that person may no longer serve as State Auditor and is ineligible for reelection
by the same Legislature and the office of State Auditor is deemed vacant.